California, session 20252026, AB1369.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 35183.1 of the Education Code is amended to read:35183.1. (a) A pupil may wear traditional tribal regalia or recognized objects of religious or cultural significance, as determined by the pupil and the pupil’s family, as an adornment at school graduation ceremonies or related school events.(b) A local educational agency shall not require either of the following:(1) A preapproval process for a pupil to exercise the pupil’s rights pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) A pupil to wear a cap if the cap is incompatible with the adornment.(c) This section does not limit a local educational agency’s discretion and authority to prohibit an item that is likely to cause a substantial disruption of, or material interference with, the ceremony.(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Adornment” means either of the following:(A) Something attached to, worn with, or worn in place of, the cap customarily worn at school graduation ceremonies.(B) Something attached to or worn with, but not replacing, the gown customarily worn at school graduation ceremonies.(2) “Cultural” means recognized practices and traditions of a certain group of people.(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.